Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8474.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 22-7.4 of the General Laws entitled "Permanent Joint Committee on
Naming All New Buildings, Bridges, Edifices and Other State Constructions" is hereby amended
by adding thereto the following section:
22-7.4-160. George Nee Bridge.
Bridge number 44‑000000000007010, located in Providence, Rhode Island, where U.S.
Route 44 (Smith Street) crosses over both northbound and southbound lanes of Interstate 95,
roughly a tenth of a mile south of the junction with Route 146, shall hereafter be named the “George
Nee Bridge” and provided further, signs indicating such shall be provided through private funds
with the design and placement approved by the department of transportation.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006318/SUB A
========